District of Columbia statutes.
2-219.35

Executive Director.

The Office shall be headed by an Executive Director appointed by the Mayor. The Executive Director shall be a resident of the District of Columbia or agree to become a resident of the District of Columbia within 180 days of appointment by the Mayor. The Executive Director shall employ staff as needed, in accordance with annual appropriations.

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 1022, 55 DCR 7598

History